test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k31_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    veggur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: veggur
    veggur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: vegg
    veggur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: veggi
    veggur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: veggjar
    veggur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: veggir
    veggur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: veggir
    veggur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: veggjum
    veggur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: veggja
    veggur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: veggurin
    veggur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: veggin
    veggur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: vegginum
    veggur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: veggjarins
    veggur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: veggirnir
    veggur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: veggirnar
    veggur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: veggjunum
    veggur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: veggjanna
